Utah statutes.
13-32a-103.   Compliance with criminal code and this chapter.
Every pawn or secondhand business shall, regarding each article of property a
person pawns or sells, comply with the requirements of this chapter and the
requirements of  Subsections 76-6-408(2)(c)(i) through (iii) regarding the
person's:
(1)  legal right to the property;
(2)  fingerprint; and
(3)  picture identification.
